Hawaii statutes.
§481-9.5 Automatic renewal clauses and
continuous service clauses. (a) Any person who sells or offers to sell
any products or services to a consumer pursuant to a consumer contract that has
a specified term of more than one month and an automatic renewal clause under
which the contract will automatically renew for a specified term of more than
one month unless the consumer cancels the contract, shall disclose the
automatic renewal clause and the procedure by which the consumer can cancel
automatic renewal of the consumer contract clearly and conspicuously in the
consumer contract.

(b) Any person who sells or offers to sell any
products or services to a consumer pursuant to a consumer contract that has a
specified contract term of twelve months or more, under which the contract will
automatically renew for a specified term of more than one month unless the
consumer cancels the consumer contract, shall notify the consumer clearly and
conspicuously:

(1) That the consumer contract will automatically
renew unless the consumer cancels the contract;

(2) How to cancel the contract; and

(3) The deadline by which the consumer shall respond
to cancel the consumer contract and prevent automatic renewal.

The notice provided to the consumer under this
subsection shall be sent to the consumer no less than thirty days and no more
than sixty days before the date upon which the consumer shall respond under
paragraph (3).

(c) The notice to the consumer required by
this section may be provided electronically if the:

(1) Transaction for sale of products or services was
conducted electronically at the election of the consumer and in compliance with
the requirements of chapter 489E, the uniform electronic transactions act; or

(2) Consumer elects to receive electronic communications
and provides a valid electronic-mail address for the purpose of receiving the
notice required by this section.

(d) Any person who sells or offers to sell any
products or services to a consumer pursuant to a consumer contract that
contains a continuous service clause shall clearly and conspicuously disclose
the continuous service clause and the procedure by which the consumer can
cancel the contract.

(e) No person shall charge the consumer's
credit or debit card or the consumer's account with a third party for an
automatic renewal or a continuous service without first obtaining the
consumer's affirmative consent to the agreement containing the automatic
renewal offer terms or continuous service offer terms.

(f) Any person who sells or offers to sell
products or services subject to this section shall provide the consumer with an
acknowledgment that the consumer may retain the automatic renewal or continuous
service offer terms, cancellation policy, and procedure by which the consumer
may cancel the contract. If the offer includes a free trial, the acknowledgment
shall also clearly and conspicuously disclose the right of the consumer to
cancel before payment is made for the goods or services and the cancellation
procedure.

(g) A person making automatic renewal or
continuous service offers pursuant to a consumer contract shall include a
toll-free telephone number, electronic-mail address, postal address if the
seller directly bills the consumer, or a clearly and conspicuously described
cost-effective, timely, and easy-to-use alternative means to communicate the
cancellation.

(h) In the case of a material change in the
terms of the automatic renewal or continuous service offer pursuant to a
consumer contract that has been accepted by a consumer in Hawaii, the person
shall clearly and conspicuously provide the consumer with a notice of the
material change and provide information regarding how to cancel in a manner
that is capable of being retained by the consumer prior to the implementation
of the material change.

(i) Any person who knowingly violates this
section or who knowingly fails to cancel an automatic renewal contract or a
continuous service contract upon consumer request shall be deemed to have
engaged in an unfair method of competition and unfair or deceptive act or
practice in the conduct of any trade or commerce within the meaning of section
480-2.

(j) This section shall not apply to any:

(1) Financial institution subject to chapter 412 to
the extent that the financial institution is engaged in activities regulated
pursuant to chapter 412;

(2) Insurer subject to chapter 431, 432, or 432D to
the extent that the insurer is engaged in activities regulated pursuant to
those chapters;

(3) Telecommunications provider subject to chapter 269;
and

(4) Cable operator subject to chapter 440G or 440J to
the extent that the provider is engaged in activities regulated pursuant to
those chapters or the Federal Communications Commission.

(k) For purposes of this section:

"Automatic renewal" means a plan or
arrangement in which a paid subscription or purchasing agreement with a term of
more than one month is automatically renewed at the end of a definite term for
a specified term of more than one month.

"Clearly and conspicuously" means in
larger type than the surrounding text; in contrasting type, font, or color to
the surrounding text of the same size; or set off from the surrounding text of
the same size by symbols or other marks in a manner that clearly calls
attention to the language. In the case of an audio disclosure, "clear and
conspicuous" and "clearly and conspicuously" mean in a volume
and cadence sufficient to be readily audible and understandable.

"Consumer" shall have the same
meaning as in section 480-1.

"Continuous service" means a plan or
arrangement in which a paid subscription or purchasing agreement continues
until the consumer cancels the service. [L 2011, c 139, §1; am L 2015, c 200, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next